Utah statutes.
62A-6-110.   Notice of hearing -- Service.
A copy of the petition and notice of the hearing shall be served personally on
the person to be sterilized not less than 20 days before the hearing date.
The notice shall state the date, time, and place of the hearing, and shall
specifically state that the hearing is to adjudicate either a petition for
declaration of capacity to give informed consent to sterilization or a
petition for sterilization.  Notice shall be served on that person's parents,
spouse, guardian, or custodian and on his attorney by the clerk of the court,
by certified mail, not less than 10 days before the hearing date.
